Arkansas, session 2025, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-18-724. Extracurricular activity — Limitations on participation.
(a) As used in this section, "extracurricular activity" means an
intraschool or interschool activity that is not included in a regular
curriculum, including without limitation an athletic activity, a fine arts
program, a special interest club, or any other group that is subject to the
rules of the Arkansas Activities Association.
(b) A public school shall not schedule, host, or otherwise require or
incentivize a practice, scrimmage, game, or activity for an extracurricular
activity outdoors during the hours for which the National Weather Service
*TNL094*
01/22/2025 1:19:20 PM TNL094

HB1197
issues an excessive heat warning.
(c) This section does not apply if the practice, scrimmage, game, or
activity for an extracurricular activity occurs in:
(1) Water; or
(2) A climate-controlled indoor facility.































01/22/2025 1:19:20 PM TNL094